Louisiana, session 2026, SB408.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 23:1021, 1034.2(C) and (F), 1201(E)
and the introductory paragraph of (F) and (F)(2), 1203(B), and 1203.1(J)(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 23:1021(14) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1021. Terms defined
Page 1 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following terms shall be given the meaning ascribed to them in this Section: have
the meanings ascribed to them:
* * *
(14) "Payor" means the entity responsible by law or contract for
payment of the medical expenses incurred by or on behalf of an employee as a
result of a work injury or occupational disease compensable pursuant to this
Chapter.
* * *
§1034.2. Reimbursement schedule
* * *
C.(1) The reimbursement schedule shall include charges limited to the mean
of the usual and customary charges for such care, services, treatment, drugs, and
supplies. Any necessary adjustments to the reimbursement schedule adopted and
established in accordance with the provisions of this Section may be made annually.
Reimbursement for an implant shall be the total of the original manufacturer's
invoice or the authorized distributor's invoice amount paid plus twenty percent.
For the purposes of this Subsection, "implant" means plastic and metallic
implants or nonautogenous graft materials.
(2) The assistant secretary shall have the authority to collect the information
and data necessary to calculate the reimbursement schedule. The collection of
information and data shall be governed by the following guidelines:
(a) The assistant secretary shall create a written survey detailing the
information requested.
(b) The survey shall be managed by the office of workers' compensation
administration in conjunction with an academic institution.
(c) The information requested shall be based upon data at least six months
old.
(d) There shall be a minimum of thirty health care providers reporting data
upon which each disseminated statistic is based.
Page 2 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
(e) No individual health care provider's data shall represent more than
twenty-five percent on a weighted basis of each statistic.
(f) Any information disseminated shall be sufficiently aggregated such that
it will not allow recipients to identify the prices charged or compensation paid by any
particular health care provider.
(3) All information collected pursuant to this Subsection shall be confidential
and privileged, shall not be public record, and shall not be subject to subpoena. Such
confidentiality shall be strictly maintained by the assistant secretary, all employees
of the office, and by the academic institution and shall be used exclusively for the
purpose of promulgating the workers' compensation reimbursement schedule.
Whoever violates this Paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more
than five hundred dollars for each offense.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, reimbursement for
dental services shall not exceed the seventieth percentile in the current edition of the
National Dental Advisory Service (NDAS) Comprehensive Fee Report, utilizing the
average of geographic multipliers for Louisiana as published in the NDAS report.
* * *
F.(1) Should a dispute arise between a health care provider and the employee,
employer, or workers' compensation insurer either payor regarding billing,
payment, explanation of benefits, reconsideration, or the appropriate amount
owed for the provision of medical services that have been rendered pursuant to
this Section, the disputing party may shall submit the dispute for resolution to the
office in the same manner and subject to the same procedures as established for
dispute resolution of claims for workers' compensation benefits of workers'
compensation administration's medical services section in a form and manner
as promulgated in rule by the assistant secretary. The office shall render a
decision no later than fifteen business days from submission of the dispute. The
nonprevailing party shall pay the cost of the review and if the judgment results
in the payment of a claim that was denied, interest shall be paid in the amount
of twelve percent per annum from the date of the denial of the claim. The
Page 3 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
decision of the office of workers' compensation administration's medical
services section shall be final.
(2) Upon written notice of the decision by the workers' compensation
administration's medical services section, the nonprevailing party may appeal
the decision within thirty days of its receipt by certified mail. The appeal shall
be to the judicial district court of proper venue as provided in the Code of Civil
Procedure.
(3) The assistant secretary shall publish, at least annually, data and
statistics regarding the disputes filed and the decisions rendered pursuant to
this Section.
(4) In addition to any other occasion when consolidation of claims is
otherwise allowed by applicable law, whenever Whenever multiple disputes exist
between a single health care healthcare provider and a single "payor" as defined in
R.S. 23:1142(A) concerning the proper amount payable pursuant to the
reimbursement schedule then workers' compensation payor, either the health care
healthcare provider or the payor shall have the right to have all such disputes
between the payor and the health care healthcare provider consolidated and tried
decided together. The venue for such consolidated claims shall be in either the
workers' compensation district of the parish in which the domicile of the provider is
located or the workers' compensation district of the parish in which the domicile of
the payor or employer is located.
(5) The assistant secretary shall promulgate rules and forms pursuant
to the Administrative Procedure Act necessary to implement the dispute
resolution process provided for in this Subsection no later than January 1, 2028.
* * *
§1201. Time and place of payment; failure to pay timely; failure to authorize;
penalties and attorney fees
* * *
E.(1) Medical benefits payable under this Chapter shall be paid within sixty
days after the employer or insurer receives written notice thereof, if the provider of
Page 4 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
medical services is not utilizing the electronic billing rules and regulations provided
for in R.S. 23:1203.2.
(2) For those providers of medical services who utilize the electronic billing
rules and regulations provided for in R.S. 23:1203.2, medical Medical benefits
payable under pursuant to this Chapter shall be paid within thirty days after the
employer payor or insurer receives a complete electronic medical bill, as defined by
rules promulgated required by administrative rules promulgated by Louisiana
Works.
(2) Failure to pay medical benefits as required by this Subsection shall
be subject to fines and interest pursuant to R.S. 23:1034.2(F).
F. Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, failure to provide payment
in accordance with this Section or failure to consent to the employee's request to
select a treating physician or change physicians when such consent is required by
R.S. 23:1121 shall result in the assessment of a penalty in an amount up to the
greater of twelve percent of any unpaid compensation or medical benefits, or fifty
dollars per calendar day for each day in which any and all compensation or medical
benefits remain unpaid or such consent is withheld, together with reasonable attorney
fees for each disputed claim; however, the fifty dollars per calendar day penalty shall
not exceed a maximum of two thousand dollars in the aggregate for any claim. The
maximum amount of penalties which may be imposed at a hearing on the merits
regardless of the number of penalties which might be imposed under pursuant to
this Section is eight thousand dollars. An award of penalties and attorney fees at any
hearing on the merits shall be res judicata as to any and all claims for which penalties
may be imposed under pursuant to this Section which precedes the date of the
hearing. Penalties shall be assessed in the following manner:
* * *
(2) This Subsection shall not apply if the claim is reasonably controverted or
if such nonpayment results from conditions over which the employer or insurer had
no control.
* * *
Page 5 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
§1203. Duty to furnish medical and vocational rehabilitation expenses; prosthetic
devices; other expenses
* * *
B. The obligation of the employer to furnish such care, services, treatment,
drugs, and supplies, whether in state or out of state, is limited to the reimbursement
determined to be the mean of the usual and customary charges for such care,
services, treatment, drugs, and supplies, as determined under the reimbursement
schedule annually published pursuant to R.S. 23:1034.2 or the actual charge made
for the service, whichever is less. Any out-of-state provider is also to be subject to
the procedures established under the office of workers' compensation administration
utilization review rules.
* * *
§1203.1. Definitions; medical treatment schedule; medical advisory council
* * *
J.(1) After a medical provider has submitted to the payor the request for
authorization and the information required by the Louisiana Administrative Code,
Title 40, Chapter 27, the payor shall notify the medical provider of their its action
on the request within five business days of receipt of the request. If any dispute arises
after January 1, 2011, Any request for authorization of office visits, diagnostic
testing, chiropractic treatment of twelve office visits or less, or physical therapy
of twelve office visits or less is considered authorized and approved by the
payor, if it has not been specifically denied within five business days. Upon
expiration of five business days of submission of a request for authorization of
nonsurgical treatment, the healthcare provider that made the request may
notify the director of the office of workers' compensation that no denial of
authorization has occurred on a form promulgated by the office of workers'
compensation, and within five business days of receipt of such notice the
director of the office of workers' compensation shall issue an order directing
that the requested treatment, procedure, or testing is authorized, if it is found
that the medical provider properly submitted to the payor the request for
Page 6 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
authorization along with the information required by Chapter 27 of Title 40 of
the Louisiana Administrative Code. If the payor has timely denied authorization
and a dispute arises as to whether the recommended care, services, or treatment is
in accordance with the medical treatment schedule, or whether a variance from the
medical treatment schedule is reasonably required as contemplated in Subsection I
of this Section, any aggrieved party shall file, within fifteen calendar days, an appeal
with the office of workers' compensation administration medical director or associate
medical director on a form promulgated by the assistant secretary. The medical
director or associate medical director shall render a decision as soon as is practicable,
but in no event, not more than thirty calendar days from the date of filing.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 23:1201.1(A), (B), (D), (E), (G) through (I), (J)(2) through (4), the
introductory paragraph of (K)(1)and (K)(2) through (5) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1201.1. Controversion of compensation and medical benefits
A. Upon the first payment of compensation or upon any modification,
suspension, termination, or controversion of compensation or medical benefits for
any reason, including but not limited to issues of medical causation, compensability
of the claim, or issues arising out of R.S. 23:1121, 1124, 1208, and 1226, the
employer or payor who has been notified of the claim, shall do all of the following:
(1) Prepare a "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension, Termination,
or Controversion of Compensation and/or or Medical Benefits" on a LWC-WC
1002 form or such other form as may be promulgated by the assistant secretary
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
(2) Send the notice of the initial indemnity payment required by Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection to the injured employee on the same day as no later than
three business days after the first payment of compensation is made by the payor
after the payor has received notice of the claim from the employer.
(3) Send a copy of the notice of the initial payment of indemnity required
by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to the office within ten days from the on the
Page 7 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
same date the original notice was sent to the injured employee or by facsimile to the
injured employee's representative.
(4) Send the "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension, Termination, or
Controversion of Compensation and/or Medical Benefits" to the injured employee
by certified mail, to the address at which the employee is receiving payments of
compensation, on or before the effective date of a modification, suspension,
termination, or controversion.
B. The form of the "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension,
Termination, or Controversion of Compensation and/or Medical Benefits" shall be
promulgated by the office Upon any modification, suspension, termination, or
controversion of compensation or medical benefits for any reason, including but
not limited to issues of medical causation, compensability of the claim, or issues
arising out of R.S. 23:1121, 1124, 1208, or 1226, the employer or payor shall do
all of the following:
(1) Prepare a "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension,
Termination, or Controversion of Compensation or Medical Benefits" on a
LWC-WC 1002 form or such other form as may be promulgated by the
assistant secretary pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
(2) Send the notice required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to the
injured employee within three business days after the effective date of the
modification, suspension, termination, or controversion.
(3) Send a copy of the notice required by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection to the office on the same date the original notice was sent to the
employee.
* * *
D.(1) Any notice required to be sent to the injured employee pursuant to
this Section shall be sent by certified mail or commercial carrier to the address
at which the employee is receiving payment of indemnity benefits, by electronic
mail to the employee's electronic mail address on file with the employer or
payor or by hand delivery to the employee.
Page 8 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
(2) For purposes of receiving notice required by this Section, the
employee shall provide a mailing address and may also provide an electronic
mail address upon request from the employer or payor.
(3) If the injured employee is represented by an attorney, the notice shall also
be provided sent to the employee's representative attorney by facsimile, certified
mail, commercial carrier, electronic mail, or hand delivery. Proof that the notice
was sent to the employee's representative by facsimile as required by this
Paragraph shall be prima facie evidence of compliance with Subsection A of this
Section.
E. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to questions of medical
necessity as provided by R.S. 23:1203.1, or disputes concerning the amount of
reimbursement pursuant to R.S. 23:1034.2.
* * *
G.(1) If the employer or the payor provides the benefit that the employee
claims is due, including any arrearage, on the returned form or letter of amicable
demand within seven ten business days of receipt of the employee's demand, the
employer or payor shall not be subject to any claim for any penalties or attorney fees
arising from the disputed payment, modification, suspension, termination, or
controversion.
(2) If the employer or payor does not provide the benefit that the employee
claims is due, the employee may file a disputed claim for benefit provided it is filed
within the prescriptive period established under R.S. 23:1209. If the prescription date
of the claim occurs within the seven-day ten-day waiting period, the employee will
be allowed to file a disputed claim without waiting the seven ten business days as
provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. However, the employer or payor shall
still be allowed seven ten business days to provide the benefit that the employee
claims is due, and if the employer does provide the benefit, the disputed claim will
be moot regarding the issues arising out of the payment, suspension, modification,
termination, or controversion of benefits. All other issues alleged in the disputed
claim will be unaffected by the payment.
Page 9 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
H. The employer or the payor who wishes to have a preliminary
determination hearing shall request the hearing in his answer to the disputed claim
arising from the notice of initial payment or any subsequent modification,
suspension, termination, or notice of controversion. In cases where a disputed claim
is already pending when an issue arises from a subsequent notice of payment,
modification, suspension, termination, or controversion of benefits, such request
shall be made in an amended pleading filed within fifteen ten business days of the
expiration of the seven-day ten-day period set forth in Paragraph (G)(1) of this
Section.
I.(1) An Preliminary determinations as provided for in this Section are
favored under the law and an employer or payor who has not complied with the
requirements set forth in either Subsection A through E of this Section or has not
initially accepted the claim as compensable, subject to further investigation and
subsequent controversion or Subsection B of this Section, and who has provided
notice as required by Subsection D of this Section, shall not be entitled to a
preliminary determination. An employer or payor who is not entitled to a preliminary
determination or who is so entitled but fails to request a preliminary determination
may be subject to penalties and attorney fees pursuant to R.S. 23:1201 at a trial on
the merits or hearing held pursuant to Paragraph (K)(8) of this Section.
(2) If disputed by the parties, upon a rule to show cause held prior to the
preliminary determination or any hearing held pursuant to this Section, the workers'
compensation judge shall determine whether the employer is in compliance An
employee who objects to a request for a preliminary determination shall file a
notice of objection to the request within twenty-one business days of receiving
the documentation required to be produced by the employer or payor pursuant
to Paragraph (J)(4) of this Section. The notice of objection shall be considered
by the workers’ compensation judge by a rule to show cause prior to any
preliminary determination hearing. Failure to file the notice of objection within
the prescribed time period shall be deemed a waiver of any objection to the
preliminary determination hearing. The assistant secretary shall promulgate a
Page 10 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
standard notice of objection form in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
J. * * *
(2) The testimony of physicians may be introduced by certified records or
deposition. The parties may agree to allow uncertified medical records and physician
reports to be introduced into evidence. Witnesses may testify at the hearing or, if
agreed on by the parties, may offer testimony by introduction of a deposition.
(3) The preliminary determination hearing shall be held no later than ninety
days from the scheduling conference. However, upon a showing of good cause, one
extension of an additional thirty days is permitted upon approval by the workers'
compensation judge. The workers' compensation judge shall issue a preliminary
determination no later than thirty fifteen days after the hearing.
(4) Any employer or payor requesting a preliminary determination hearing
shall produce all documentation relied on by the employer or payor in calculating,
modifying, suspending, terminating, or controverting the employee's benefits. These
documents shall be disclosed to the employee or the employee's representative within
ten business days of the request for the preliminary determination hearing.
K.(1) The employer or payor shall, within ten calendar business days of the
mailing of the preliminary determination from the workers' compensation judge, do
either of the following:
* * *
(2) Any employer or payor who accepts and complies with the workers'
compensation judge's determination within ten calendar business days, shall not be
subject to any penalty or attorney fees arising out of the original notice which was
the subject of the preliminary hearing.
(3) Any employer or payor who accepts and complies with the workers'
compensation judge's determination, but who disagrees with such preliminary
determination, shall notify the court within ten business days of receipt of the
preliminary determination of his desire to proceed to a trial on the merits of the
matters that were the subject of the preliminary hearing.
Page 11 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
(4) Any employer or payor who does not accept the workers' compensation
judge's determination or fails to comply with the determination within ten calendar
business days, may, at the trial on the merits, be subject to penalties and attorney
fees pursuant to R.S. 23:1201, arising out of the issues raised in the original notice
of payment, modification, suspension, termination, or controversion of benefits,
which was the subject of the preliminary hearing.
(5) Any injured employee who disagrees with the preliminary determination
shall notify the court within ten business days of the receipt of such preliminary
determination of his desire to proceed to a trial on the merits of the matters that were
the subject of the preliminary hearing. If the employer or payor has accepted and
complied with the preliminary hearing determination, the employer or payor shall
also be entitled to litigate all issues including those issues presented at the
preliminary determination hearing.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 23:1203.2 is hereby amended and reenacted and Subpart K of Part
1 of Chapter 10 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S.
23:1200.18.1 through 1200.18.9, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART K. ALL WORKERS' COMPENSATION MEDICAL
BILL DATABASE
§1200.18.1. Short title
This Subpart shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana All
Workers' Compensation Medical Bill Database Act".
§1200.18.2. Terms defined
As used in this Subpart, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise,
the following terms have the meanings ascribed to them:
(1) "Database" means the All Workers' Compensation Medical Bill
Database.
(2) "Medical claim" means any claim submitted by a healthcare provider
to a payor for payment for healthcare services, pharmaceuticals, durable
medical equipment, or related services provided to an employee pursuant to this
Page 12 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
Chapter.
§1200.18.3. Establishment of database
A.(1) The assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation
administration shall establish and maintain the All Workers' Compensation
Medical Bill Database.
(2) The database shall contain medical and pharmacy claims information
submitted by all payors providing workers' compensation coverage in this state.
B. The purpose of the database shall be to do all of the following:
(1) Improve transparency in medical reimbursement trends.
(2) Assist in enforcement and maintenance of an appropriate fee
schedule.
(3) Evaluate medical utilization patterns and outcomes.
(4) Detect fraud, waste, and abuse.
(5) Support policy development, rate analysis, and system oversight.
C. The assistant secretary may retain and consult with qualified
individuals or organizations with expertise in data analytics and medical billing
for purposes of creation, operation, and maintenance of the database. However,
data contained in the database shall only consist of claims data obtained directly
from workers' compensation payors in this state.
D.(1) The office may retain, at its expense, a qualified and independent
provider-based claims administrator or claims examiner with demonstrated
expertise in Louisiana claims administration, reimbursement methodologies,
and payor payment data analysis. The administrator or examiner shall collect,
analyze, and report professional and technical claims charge and payment data
for actuarial review and system oversight purposes. The submitted data shall
be utilized to develop evidence-based fee schedule recommendations to the office
and to identify system imbalances, including:
(a) Outlier provider claims patterns.
(b) Unpaid claims.
(c) Underpaid claims.
Page 13 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
(d) Untimely paid claims.
(e) Revenue cycle management aging metrics by payor and by claim
service line.
(2) The office shall utilize the data to promote transparency,
accountability, and evidence-based operational practices within the healthcare
claims payment system. The office may evaluate provider claims activity and
payor revenue cycle management behavioral algorithms to identify
inefficiencies, improve digital and electronic claims processing work-flows, and
enhance administrative efficiency throughout the system.
(3) All data collected and maintained pursuant to this Section shall
remain confidential and shall be protected in accordance with applicable state
and federal privacy and data security laws. The office shall establish safeguards
necessary to preserve data integrity, prevent unauthorized disclosure, and
ensure compliance with all applicable confidentiality requirements.
(4) The office may further utilize RCM data and actuarial findings to
determine whether penalties, corrective actions, or other enforcement measures
should be assessed against providers for improper billing practices or against
payors for improper payment practices, including patterns of delayed, denied,
or inaccurate reimbursement.
§1200.18.4. Mandatory reporting requirements
A.(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, all workers' compensation payors shall
submit to the assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation
administration medical and pharmacy claims data for all workers'
compensation claims arising pursuant to state law.
(2) Submission shall occur in a format, time, and manner prescribed by
rule of the office of workers' compensation administration.
B. Required data elements shall include all of the following:
(1) Date of injury.
(2) Employer industry classification.
(3) Provider specialty and identifier.
Page 14 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
(4) Current procedural terminology (CPT) codes, Healthcare Common
Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) codes, National Drug Code (NDC) codes,
and International Classification of Diseases (ICD) codes, as applicable.
(5) Billed charge and allowed amount.
(6) Paid amount.
(7) Service dates.
(8) Utilization review actions.
(9) Claim status indicators.
C. Data shall be submitted quarterly unless otherwise required by
provisions of Part I of Title 40 of the Louisiana Administrative Code that
establish, promulgate, and update the reimbursement schedule.
§1200.18.5. Rulemaking authority
A. The assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation
administration shall promulgate rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement this Subpart.
B. Rules shall include but not be limited to all of the following:
(1) Technical data submission standards.
(2) Data validation procedures.
(3) Compliance time lines.
(4) Procedures for correction of erroneous submissions.
(5) Standards for public reporting.
§1200.18.6. Confidentiality and data protection
A.(1) All information collected pursuant to this Subpart and maintained
in the database shall be confidential and privileged and shall not be public
record and subject to subpoena. This confidentiality shall be strictly maintained
by the assistant secretary, all employees of the office, and by any agent or
contractor of the state and shall be used exclusively for the purposes set forth
in this Subpart. Whoever violates the provisions of this Paragraph shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than five hundred dollars for each
offense.
Page 15 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
(2) The database shall comply with applicable state and federal privacy
and security laws.
B. Public reports shall present only aggregated or de-identified data.
§1200.18.7. Authorized uses
The assistant secretary of the office of workers' compensation
administration shall only use the database data for any of the following reasons:
(1) Monitoring compliance with medical fee schedule regulations.
(2) Studying medical cost drivers and utilization trends.
(3) Supporting actuarial review and rate analysis.
(4) Evaluating the effectiveness of medical treatment guidelines.
(5) Developing, revising, or modernizing the workers' compensation
medical fee schedule pursuant to the provisions of this Subpart.
(6) Reporting annually to the legislature.
§1200.18.8. Data integrity
A. The assistant secretary shall have the authority to investigate and
audit the claim data submissions of any workers' compensation payor upon a
reasonable belief that a payor or healthcare provider is engaging in conduct
that may undermine the accuracy, completeness, or reliability of the data
contained in the database.
B. Each workers' compensation payor shall fully cooperate with any
investigation or audit conducted pursuant to this Section and shall provide
access to all records, documents, and information reasonably necessary to verify
the accuracy and completeness of submitted data.
C. Failure of a workers' compensation payor to fully cooperate with an
investigation or audit conducted pursuant to this Section shall be grounds for
the imposition of a civil fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars per day for each
day of noncompliance until such time as the payor fully complies with the
requests of the assistant secretary.
§1200.18.9. Penalties
A. If a payor fails to submit required data to the database on a timely
Page 16 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
basis, fails to correct submissions rejected because of errors, or otherwise does
not comply with the provisions of this Subpart or the rules and regulations
promulgated to carry out the provisions of this Subpart, the assistant secretary
shall provide written notice to the payor. The assistant secretary may grant an
extension of time for just cause. The assistant secretary may assess a fine not to
exceed five hundred dollars per day for noncompliance after written notice and
opportunity to cure the noncompliance. In determining whether to impose a
penalty, the assistant secretary may consider mitigating factors, including the
size and sophistication of a payor, the reasons for the failure to report, and the
detrimental impact upon the public purpose served by the database.
B. The assistant secretary may impose an additional administrative
penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars per day for those violations the
assistant secretary finds were willful. In addition, any person who knowingly
fails to comply with the confidentiality requirements of this Section or
confidentiality rules adopted pursuant to this Section and uses, sells, or
transfers the data or information for commercial advantage, pecuniary gain,
personal gain, or malicious harm shall be subject to an administrative penalty
of not more than fifty thousand dollars per violation.
* * *
§1203.2. Electronic medical billing and payment; prior authorization
A.(1) Beginning July 1, 2027, all claims for medical services rendered
shall be submitted to a workers' compensation payor in electronic format. The
assistant secretary shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the electronic
submission, processing, and payment of workers' compensation- related medical
bills, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.
"Electronic claim" means a claim submitted by a healthcare provider, or its
agent to a workers' compensation payor in an 837 (ASC X12N 837) format or
its successor, adopted by the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, or its successor, in compliance with the provisions of the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. 1302d et seq., and 45
Page 17 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
CFR Parts 160 and 162), that includes all of the following:
(a) Data that is required according to the United States Department of
Health and Human Services standards for electronic transactions.
(b) Data that becomes required due to the situation according to the
United States Department of Health and Human Services standards for
electronic transactions.
(2)(a) Such rules shall take effect no later than January 1, 2012. Within five
business days of receipt of an electronic claim, a workers' compensation payor
or its agent shall review the entire claim and, if the workers' compensation
payor determines that the claim is not an accepted claim, issue an exception
report to the provider or its agent indicating all defects or reasons known at
that time that the claim is not an accepted claim. A provider who submits a
claim that is not an accepted claim shall be deemed to have timely submitted a
claim for the payment of covered healthcare services if the health insurance
issuer or its agent fails to notify the healthcare provider, or the healthcare
clearinghouse from which the claim was received, of all defects or reasons
known at that time that the claim is not an accepted claim as required by this
Subsection.
(b) The exception report shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following
information, if known at that time, for each claim submitted:
(i) Patient name.
(ii) Provider claim number, patient account number, or unique
identification number.
(iii) Date of service.
(iv) Total billed charges.
(v) Exception report issuer's name.
(vi) The date upon which the exception report was generated.
B. The following groups shall make provisions for such an electronic claims
system: Workers' compensation payors shall adopt appropriate handling
procedures approved by the office for the acceptance of electronic claim
Page 18 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
submissions. The procedures shall include but not be limited to all of the
following:
(1) Insurance carriers shall accept medical bills electronically submitted by
health care providers, in accordance with the rules promulgated. A process for
electronically recording the time and date of actual receipt of electronic claims.
(2) Health care providers shall accept payment of medical claims submitted
electronically by insurance carriers, in accordance with the rules promulgated. A
process for electronic review of transmitted claims that assures all electronic
claims received are reviewed for determination of whether the claims are
deemed accepted in accordance with Subsection A of this Section.
(3) A process for reporting all claims not accepted and all defects or
reasons known at that time that the claims were not accepted or rejected.
C. On or after January 1, 2012, the The assistant secretary may create and
maintain a statewide electronic prior authorization portal for purposes of
approving medical care in accordance with R.S. 23:1142. The portal shall have
the capability to track and document prior authorization requests, responses,
and supporting medical documentation. The assistant secretary may conduct
pilot programs limited to specific geographic areas or specific workers'
compensation payors prior to initiating and maintaining the portal for statewide
use by all workers' compensation payors. The assistant secretary may adopt
additional rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., regarding the creation, operation, and maintenance of an
electronic exchange of medical claims information for purposes of approving
medical care in accordance with R.S. 23:1142.
D.(1) Nothing shall prohibit the assistant secretary from promulgating and
adopting rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act,
R.S. 49:950 et seq., regarding the development and implementation of a centralized
data warehouse for the collection of medical billing and payment data. No later than
January 1, 2031, the assistant secretary shall develop and implement a Workers'
Compensation Medical Quality and Outcomes Program designed to measure,
Page 19 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
evaluate, and improve the quality and effectiveness of medical care provided to
injured employees pursuant to this Chapter.
(2) The program shall complement the purposes of the workers'
compensation system by maintaining measurable indicators of quality and
outcomes, which may include but not be limited to any of the following:
(a) Time to return to work.
(b) Functional improvement measures.
(c) Duration of disability and medical treatment episodes.
(d) Utilization of evidence-based treatment guidelines.
(3) In order to support the program, the office may collect and analyze
data from the database.
(4) The office may develop mechanisms to identify best practices that
improve recovery and return-to-work outcomes.
(5) The office may adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act as necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 4. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(12) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(12) R.S. 23:1177, 1197, 1200.7, 1200.18.1, 1291, 1292, 1293, 1306, 1660,
1671
* * *
Section 5. Beginning no later than July 1, 2029, the assistant secretary of the office
of workers' compensation administration shall initiate formal rulemaking to update and
modernize the workers' compensation medical fee schedule using data derived from the All
Page 20 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
Workers' Compensation Medical Claims Database established pursuant to this Act. The
updated fee schedule shall do all of the following:
(1) Be based on empirical Louisiana-specific payment data.
(2) Provide transparency in methodology, including statistical assumptions.
(3) Promote adequate access to quality care for injured workers.
(4) Support cost predictability and system stability for employers and insurers.
The methodology for percentile calculation, data exclusions, geographic adjustments,
and statistical smoothing shall be published in detail and be included in the notice of intent
for rulemaking for public review.
In developing the inpatient and outpatient hospital services and ambulatory surgery
services reimbursement amounts, the administrator shall do all of the following:
(1) Analyze allowed amounts and paid amounts reflected in the database.
(2) Evaluate reimbursement percentiles for comparable services across geographic
regions.
(3) Consider access to care metrics, including provider participation rates and
treatment timeliness.
(4) Review utilization patterns and cost drivers by procedure category.
The methodology for percentile calculation, data exclusions, geographic adjustments,
and statistical smoothing shall be published in detail and be included in the notice of intent
for rulemaking for public review.
No revised fee schedule adopted pursuant to this Section shall become effective
unless approved by the legislature and signed by the governor. The assistant secretary of the
office of workers' compensation administration shall submit:
(1) The proposed fee schedule.
(2) The published methodology.
(3) The actuarial impact analysis.
Not later than thirty days prior to the start of the 2029 Regular Session of the
Legislature, the assistant secretary shall submit a written report to the legislature. The report
shall be submitted for the purpose of assisting the legislature in the development and
consideration of future legislation establishing or revising a medical fee schedule or
Page 21 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
reimbursement methodology for workers’ compensation medical services. The report shall
include, to the extent practicable and based upon data available to the office, an analysis of
medical charges, allowed amounts, paid amounts, reimbursement patterns, utilization,
provider access, and other factors relevant to the establishment of a workers’ compensation
medical fee schedule. The report shall include the following:
(1) A summary of charge, allowed amount, and paid amount data by procedure code,
provider type, specialty, place of service, and geographic area.
(2) An analysis of median, average, and percentile-based reimbursement amounts,
including the twenty-fifth percentile, seventy-fifth percentile, and ninetieth percentile, where
sufficient data exists.
(3) A comparison of workers’ compensation reimbursement amounts to Medicare
reimbursement amounts, including the percentage of Medicare paid by code, service
category, provider type, specialty, and facility setting, where applicable.
(4) An analysis of allowed-to-charge ratios and variations in billed charges, allowed
amounts, and paid amounts.
(5) Identification of high-volume and high-cost services, including professional
services, hospital outpatient services, ambulatory surgical center services, imaging, physical
medicine, pain management, orthopedic services, and other categories determined relevant
by the assistant secretary.
(6) An analysis of utilization patterns, including units of service, frequency of
services, treatment intensity, and variation by injury type, provider type, specialty, and
geographic area, where such information is available.
(7) An analysis of outlier billing, reimbursement, or utilization patterns, including
unusual variations, excessive units, upcoding, unbundling, duplicate billing, or other patterns
that may affect the reliability of fee schedule development.
(8) An analysis of provider access, including provider participation, appointment
availability, geographic access, and any available information regarding delays in care,
denial patterns, or treatment disputes.
(9) An analysis of total medical cost by claim or injury episode, including, where
available, the relationship between reimbursement, utilization, disability duration, return-to-
Page 22 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
work outcomes, litigation, and claim closure.
(10) A discussion of potential reimbursement methodologies, including Medicare-
based multipliers, percentile-based reimbursement, blended methodologies, geographic
adjustments, service-category adjustments, or other approaches used in workers’
compensation medical fee schedules.
(11) Identification of data limitations, assumptions, exclusions, and areas where
additional data may be necessary before a medical fee schedule or reimbursement
methodology is proposed by legislation.
The report shall be informational only and shall not constitute a rule, regulation, fee
schedule, reimbursement schedule, maximum allowable reimbursement amount, or proposed
medical fee schedule. Nothing in the report shall authorize the assistant secretary or the
office to establish, implement, enforce, or require payment pursuant to a medical fee
schedule unless expressly authorized by law.
Section 6. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall only become effective upon
approval by the legislature of the updated fee schedule as required in Section 5 of this Act.
Section 7. The provisions of R.S. 23:1034.2(F) shall become effective no later than
January 1, 2029.
Section 8. The provisions of this Section and Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of this Act
shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor,
upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as
provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval.
Section 9. Until the adoption and promulgation of a revised reimbursement schedule
by the assistant secretary of the office of workers’ compensation administration pursuant to
R.S. 23:1034.2 and the Administrative Procedure Act, the current reimbursement fee
schedule and all rules, regulations, manuals, and reimbursement methodologies in effect
prior to the effective date of this Act shall continue to govern reimbursement for medical
services rendered under the Louisiana Workers’ Compensation Act.
Section 10. If a reimbursement schedule for care, services, treatment, drugs, and
Page 23 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 408 ENROLLED
supplies has not been adopted and implemented on or before July 1, 2029, the assistant
secretary shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, promulgate all rules
and regulations necessary to establish, implement, administer, and enforce a reimbursement
schedule for such care, services, treatment, drugs, and supplies. The reimbursement schedule
shall be based upon usual and customary charges derived from the All Workers'
Compensation Medical Bill Database.
Section 11. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end
the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 24 of 24
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.